Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.109.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Eligible participant" means an international student whose country of residence has a trade relationship with the state of Washington.

(2) "Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a college or university in the state of Washington that is accredited by an accrediting association recognized as such by rule of the student achievement council.

(3) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.

(4) "Service obligation" means volunteering for a minimum number of hours as established by the student achievement council based on the amount of scholarship award, to speak to or teach groups of Washington citizens, including but not limited to elementary, middle, and high schools, service clubs, and universities.

(5) "Washington international exchange scholarship program" means a scholarship award for a period not to exceed one academic year to attend a Washington institution of higher education made to an international student whose country has an established trade relationship with Washington.

[ 2012 c 229 s 565; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 195; 1996 c 253 s 401.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—Purpose—1996 c 253: "(1) The legislature finds that:

(a) Educational, cultural, and business exchange programs are important in developing mutually beneficial relationships between Washington state and other countries;

(b) Enhanced international trade, cultural, and educational opportunities are developed when cities, counties, ports, and others establish sister relationships with their counterparts in other countries;

(c) It is important to the economic future of the state to promote international awareness and understanding; and

(d) The state's economy and economic well-being depend heavily on foreign trade and international exchanges.

(2) The legislature declares that the purpose of chapter 253, Laws of 1996 is to:

(a) Enhance Washington state's ability to develop relationships and contacts throughout the world enabling us to expand international education and trade opportunities for all citizens of the state;

(b) Develop and maintain an international database of contacts in international trade markets;

(c) Encourage outstanding international students who reside in countries with existing trade relationships to attend Washington state's institutions of higher education; and

(d) Encourage Washington students to attend institutions of higher education located in countries with existing trading relationships with Washington state." [ 1996 c 253 s 1.]

Severability—1996 c 253: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1996 c 253 s 504.]

Part headings not law—1996 c 253: "Part headings as used in this act constitute no part of the law." [ 1996 c 253 s 505.]